Hawaii statutes.
§96-19 Penalty for obstruction. A
person who willfully hinders the lawful actions of the ombudsman or the
ombudsman's staff, or willfully refuses to comply with their lawful demands,
shall be fined not more than $1,000. [L 1967, c 306, §20; HRS §96-19; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next